Utah statutes.
46-1-11.   Prohibited acts -- Advertising.
(1)  A nonattorney notary may not provide advice or counsel to another person
concerning legal documents or legal proceedings, including immigration
matters.
(2) (a) (i)  A nonattorney notary who advertises notarial services in any
language other than  English shall include in the advertisement a notice that
the notary public is not an attorney.
(ii)  The notice under Subsection (2)(a)(i) must include the fees that a
notary may charge pursuant to Section 46-1-12 and the following statement:
"I AM NOT AN ATTORNEY LICENSED TO PRACTICE LAW IN UTAH AND MAY NOT GIVE LEGAL
ADVICE ABOUT IMMIGRATION OR ANY OTHER LEGAL MATTER OR ACCEPT FEES FOR LEGAL
ADVICE."
(b) (i)  The notice required by Subsection (2)(a) shall be in English and in
the language of the advertisement and in letters of a conspicuous size.
(ii)  If the advertisement is by radio or television, the statement may be
modified, but must include substantially the same message.
(c) (i)  Literal translation of the phrase "Notary Public" into any language
other than English is prohibited if the literal translation implies that the
notary is a licensed attorney.
(ii)  In this Subsection (2)(c), "literal translation" means the translation
of a word or phrase without regard to the true meaning of the word or phrase
in the language that is being translated.
